Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,300
Time for bringing action; limitation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any action to recover damages under the Human Trafficking Victims Civil Remedy Act shall be filed within ten years after the later of:

(1) The conclusion of any related criminal prosecution against the person or persons from whom recovery is sought;

(2) The receipt of actual or constructive notice sent or given to the trafficking victim or his or her parent or legal guardian by a member of a law enforcement entity informing the victim or his or her parent or legal guardian that the entity has identified the person who knowingly (a) engaged in human trafficking of such victim or (b) aided or assisted with the human trafficking of such victim;

(3) The time at which the human trafficking of the trafficking victim ended if he or she was eighteen years of age or older; or

(4) The victim reaching the age of majority if the victim was under eighteen years of age at the time he or she was a victim of human trafficking.

Laws 2015, LB294, § 4.